Hawaii statutes.
[§28-153] Review of incidents of
officer-involved death. (a) Each law enforcement agency in the State
shall have a written policy regarding the investigation of incidents of officer-involved death.

(b) In the event of any incident of
officer-involved death, each law enforcement agency shall be responsible for
conducting a criminal investigation of the law enforcement officer or officers
involved in the incident.

(c) Each law
enforcement agency conducting the criminal investigation of the officer-involved
death shall disclose to the board the final disposition of the law enforcement
agency's criminal investigation and all related reports, documents, and
information for the purposes of the board's review.

(d) Once the board receives the final disposition of the law enforcement agency's
criminal investigation and all related reports, documents, and information
pursuant to subsection (c), the board shall review all
matters submitted to evaluate the fairness of the criminal investigation and to
determine whether, in the board's opinion, criminal prosecution or further
investigation may be warranted.

(e) Each law
enforcement agency of the State and all of its counties shall cooperate with
and assist the board in the performance of its duties, except that the board
shall not have access to physical evidence.

(f) The board shall expeditiously make
recommendations to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the officer-involved death occurred, however, the
prosecuting attorney is not required to wait for the recommendation before
making a determination to prosecute or decline prosecution. The board's recommendations shall consist of the board's determination
that the prosecuting attorney should:

(1) Prosecute;

(2) Decline prosecution; or

(3) Conduct further investigation.

The board's
recommendations shall not be binding upon the prosecuting attorney and shall
have no effect on any determination of probable cause that may be made, at any
time.

(g) Subject to
subsection (h), all matters submitted to the board pursuant to subsection (c)
and all proceedings and recommendations of the board shall be confidential.
All records, documents, and information in the possession of the board or
maintained by the board shall not be subject to discovery or disclosure in any
civil or criminal proceedings or to a request for disclosure pursuant to
chapters 92 and 92F. The scope of this subsection shall be limited solely to
the proceedings and recommendations of the board and any records, documents,
and information in the board's possession, and this subsection shall not extend
to any records, documents, or information in the possession of another
government agency.

(h) Once the board has
issued the board's recommendations pursuant to subsection (f) and any criminal prosecution or proceedings in the State
related to the officer-involved death have been adjudicated, the board
shall release the board's recommendations and any accompanying reports,
documents, and information, unless otherwise prohibited by law.

(i) Nothing in this part shall be construed to
create a private right of action. [L 2016, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next